Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 9

On-premises Consumption

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

3-9-101. Nudity on premises prohibited — Penalty — Rules.

(a)

No person who has received a permit under any law of the State of Arkansas for the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall suffer or permit any person to appear on the permitted premises in such manner or attire as to expose to view any portion of the pubic area, anus, vulva, or genitals or any simulation thereof, nor suffer or permit any female to appear on the premises in such manner or attire as to expose to view any portion of her breast below the top of the areola or any simulation thereof.

(b)

Any hotel-motel-restaurant mixed drink permittee or private club permittee violating this section shall be subject to the penalties prescribed in §§3-9-201 —3-9-214,3-9-221 —3-9-225, and3-9-232 —3-9-237 for the violation of those sections.

(c)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall promulgate such rules as it deems necessary for the implementation of this section.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 965, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-956, 48-957; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 95.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1985, No. 965, §§ 1, 2, are also codified as §3-5-222.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c).

3-9-102. Posting of warning signs relating to drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy.

(a)(1)

A person who has received a permit under the law of this state for the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages, beer, or wine for on-premises consumption in a private club that does not hold itself out to be a food service establishment shall post in a conspicuous place a printed sign at least eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8 ½" x 11") in size with letters at least one inch (1") high that reads “Warning: Drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy may cause birth defects”.

(2)

The poster shall be printed in English, Spanish, and any other language mandated by the Voting Rights Act of 1965, 42 U.S.C. § 1973, as it existed on January 1, 2013, in the county where the poster will be posted.

(b)(1)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Board shall make a sign meeting the requirements of this section available to a person who has received a permit under the law of this state for the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages, beer, or wine for on-premises consumption in a private club that does not hold itself out to be a food service establishment.

(2)

The sign shall be available on the website of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division where documents associated with obtaining a liquor license or alcoholic beverage license are customarily located.

(3)

To obtain a copy of the sign required to be posted under this section, the owners or operators of an establishment required to post the sign under this section shall:

(A)

Print the poster from the website under subdivision (b)(3) of this section; or

(B)

Request that the sign be mailed for the cost of printing and first-class postage.

(c)(1)

If the board finds that the establishment has failed to post the information required under this section, the owner or operator shall receive:

(A)

For a first violation, a warning; and

(B)

For a second or subsequent violation, a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(2)

The violation of or noncompliance with this section and each day's continuance thereof shall constitute a separate and distinct violation.

(d)

The board shall promulgate rules to implement this section.

(e)

The board may enter into an interagency agreement with the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services regarding the funding necessary to implement this section.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1300, § 1; 2017, No. 913, § 9.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Behavioral Health Services” in (e).

U.S. Code.

42 U.S.C. § 1973, referred to in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, has been transferred to 52 U.S.C. § 10301.

Subchapter 2

— Alcoholic Beverages Generally

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 20 provided that nothing in this subchapter (excluding §3-9-226) should be construed to authorize the sale of alcoholic liquors or beer, or to allow the issuance of any permit therefor, in any ward or portion of a city, or in any county, or portion thereof, in which the sale of alcoholic liquors or beer is prohibited pursuant to local option election held under Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942. The section further provided that nothing in this subchapter (excluding §3-9-226) should be deemed to amend or repeal any of the provisions of Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942.

Acts 1999, No. 910, § 4, provided: “This Act shall be effective on or after July 1, 1999.”

Cross References.

Permit renewals generally, §3-4-216.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 21: Feb. 28, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that additional general revenues are urgently required for the State Apportionment Fund to support programs vital to the health, education, welfare, and safety of the people of this state and that unless such funds are provided, curtailment of such programs will be necessary; that the expanded economic growth of this state is essential to providing the sources of tax revenue to support such program; that the provisions of this act will stimulate the tourist and convention business in this state and will provide increased revenues from existing taxes; that the revenues to be collected under this act are essential to continuing existing levels of governmental services; that the immediate passage of this act is essential, not only to provide vitally needed revenues, but also to clarify and modernize the laws of this state regarding the sale, dispensing, and serving of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption and to strengthen the enforcement of the alcoholic beverage laws of this state; and, that the immediate passage of this act is necessary to accomplish the purposes stated herein. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 585, § 34: approved Apr. 6, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to establish an orderly procedure which will insure the monthly and quarterly distribution of funds for the necessary services and operations of the state government, as provided for in this act, it is necessary that the provisions of this act become effective immediately; that under the provisions of this act seriously needed improvements for many of our public institutions are contemplated, and only the provisions of this act will provide such funds which will be adequate to alleviate this situation; and that only the provisions of this act will correct many of our financial difficulties, and which otherwise may deprive the citizens of this state from receiving the benefits which the operation of state government contemplates. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1973, No. 387, § 3: Mar. 19, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that a situation of uncertainty exists in which there is a need for clarification of the existing governing powers of municipalities, and that such uncertainty should be resolved immediately in such way as to encourage the attraction of tourists to the State of Arkansas, safeguard the morals of our citizenry, and confirm the principal of local autonomy, and that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 137, § 3: became law without Governor's signature, Feb. 10, 1975. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that in counties of this state having a population of not less than 53,000 nor more than 58,000 there are hotels and restaurants which are licensed to dispense alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, and that there is some confusion as to what agency or body has the authority to regulate the closing hours of said licensed premises; that the law is clear that when such hotels or restaurants are located within the municipality, the governing body of such municipality may regulate the closing hours of the premises, but there are no specific provisions with respect to the closing hours of such licensed premises located within such county and outside the boundaries of any municipal corporation; that this act is designed to vest the county court of the county with the authority to establish closing hours for such licensed premises located in such counties outside the boundaries of municipalities, and that the act should be given effect immediately to clarify such confusion and to specifically vest such authority in the county court. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 420, § 3: Mar. 13, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that permits issued by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division should be renewable annually no later than August 31; and that this act is immediately necessary to so provide. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 844, § 7: May 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the collection of state general revenues during the current fiscal year has diminished to such extent that the activities of certain necessary agencies of the state government are being and will continue to be curtailed, and that the provisions of this act will aid in the correction of a situation which otherwise will deprive the citizens of this state from receiving benefits which the operation of state government contemplates. Therefore, this act being necessary for the preservation of the public health and safety shall take effect and be in full force effective May 1, 1983.”

Acts 1985, No. 384, § 3: Mar. 18, 1985. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that only nonprofit corporations organized under the laws of this state should be eligible to obtain private club permits; that it is essential to the effective and efficient enforcement of the alcoholic beverage laws that such restrictions be given effect at the earliest possible date; that this act is designed to establish such restrictions and to clarify the laws relating to the qualifications of nonprofit corporations to obtain such permits, and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 949, § 3: Apr. 13, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1016 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1989, No. 837, § 5: Mar. 22, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the term ‘restaurant’ as used in the laws relating to the service of alcoholic beverages for on premises consumption is in urgent need of clarification to assure the effective administration of such laws; that this act is designed to provide such clarification and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 606, § 14: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that numerous persons who are resident aliens of the United States desire to operate establishments that dispense alcoholic beverages in the State of Arkansas and that the same are presently prohibited from obtaining a license in their name. It is further found and determined that the requirement of United States citizenship in order to maintain these establishments poses a burden upon commerce and restricts the number of persons who are able to contribute to the overall economy of the State of Arkansas. It is further found and determined that numerous national corporations are hindered in their operations in that they cannot have newly transferred managers or other key employees assume positions of responsibility within their local outlets since those persons do not meet the two (2) year residency requirement and that such requirement poses an unreasonable burden on the conduct of business in this state as it relates to alcohol beverage outlets. It is further found that the present process of applying for or renewing ABC licenses by requiring proof of payment of personal property taxes is cumbersome, unnecessary, and has no direct relationship to the operation of the ABC permitted outlet. It is further found and determined that there are presently numerous conflicting requirements which are applied to applicants for various retail licenses issued by the state ABC Division and that it is necessary and proper that such permit requirements be made uniform. That all of the aforementioned encumbrances are a burden on the transaction of commerce in the state and upon the efficient administration of government in the state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1995, No. 563, § 10: emergency failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that although the sale of alcoholic beverages on Sunday is permitted in some cities of this State, even in those cities the sale of beer and wine is not permitted on Sunday; that it is fundamentally unfair to authorize the Sunday sale of mixed drinks but to prohibit the Sunday sale of beer and wine; that this act would provide equal protection to the purveyors of beer and wine; that to give immediate effect to this act will lessen the possibility of a challenge to the present law allowing the Sunday sale of mixed drinks, and thereby save the taxpayers the cost involved in defending the challenge and the cost of an unsuccessful defense; and that, therefore, this act should go into effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1995, No. 600, § 5: Mar. 13, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that under conditions prescribed by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division persons permitted to serve alcoholic beverages on the premises of a hotel, motel or restaurant should be authorized to serve alcoholic beverages at a large meeting or attendance facility; that this act so provides; and this act should go into effect as soon as possible in order to make more efficient the convention planning process in this state. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 910, § 4: effective on and after July 1, 1999.

Acts 1999, No. 910, § 8: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the mixed drink tax bonding requirement is putting unnecessary hardship on the taxpayers in this state; that the current ABC renewal system prevents taxpayers from renewing their liquor permits if all tax obligations have not been fully satisfied; that the bonding requirement only serves to increase taxpayers' cost of doing business without providing any significant benefit to the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1371, § 5: Apr. 12, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-Second General Assembly that the provisions of this Act are of critical importance to the State of Arkansas and its business community. The State of Arkansas is losing businesses to other states due to the restrictions imposed on selling liquor in wet counties. The provisions of this Act are necessary to ensure that the restaurant industry in Arkansas stays in Arkansas and expands its business in this state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 445, § 2: Mar. 2, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the ability of a professional baseball facility to operate efficiently and effectively is hindered by existing laws governing the sale and purchase of alcoholic beverages; that baseball season will begin in a very short period of time; and that this act is immediately necessary to enable professional baseball facilities to immediately begin preparation for baseball season. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1274, § 1: effective by its own terms Jan. 1, 2006.

Acts 2007, No. 1017, § 4: Apr. 3, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that current laws concerning the sale of alcoholic beverages at certain large attendance facilities enact a financial hardship on those facilities; and that a revision to Arkansas law is necessary to ease those hardships and provide a more equitable system of selling alcoholic beverages on certain days and times. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 294, § 30: Mar. 3, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that on-premises consumption outlets in the State of Arkansas are not able to compete on an equal and similar basis with outlets located in states surrounding the State of Arkansas; that the State of Arkansas is in need of additional revenues; that only minor adjustments to the violation fine schedule have been made since its passage in 1981; and that this act is immediately necessary to raise additional revenues and to better address violations committed by Alcoholic Beverage Control Division permit holders. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 763, § 6: Apr. 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that Act 294 of 2009 became effective, by emergency clause, on March 3, 2009, and that it has been found that there are some technical corrections that need to be placed into immediate operation. It is further determined that these technical corrections are necessary to give full force and effect to the provisions of Act 294 of 2009 and that if this technical corrections bill is not passed with an emergency clause then unnecessary confusion concerning the provisions of Act 294 of 2009 may arise. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 117: Apr. 10, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act makes various revisions to Arkansas election laws that are designed to improve the administration of elections and special elections and that these revisions should be implemented as soon as possible so that the citizens of this state may benefit from improved election procedures. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1008, § 2: emergency failed to pass. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that an affected city, county, or political subdivision needs to be permitted to begin converting the purpose of an alcoholic beverage permit during the renewal period to avoid additional costs and the interruption of business. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 1100, § 5: Apr. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the law regarding the definition of ‘restaurant’ is necessary to avoid ambiguity in state law and the Arkansas Beverage Control Division's rules. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

3-9-201. Legislative determinations and intent.

(a)

The General Assembly reaffirms the policy of this state of strict enforcement of alcoholic beverage control laws and further reaffirms the policy of this state that the qualified electors of any city, county, or political subdivision thereof shall have the right of local option pursuant to Initiated Act No. 1 of 1942, as amended, §§3-8-201 —3-8-203 and3-8-205 —3-8-209, to prohibit the manufacture or sale of intoxicating liquor therein.

(b)

The General Assembly further declares and recognizes the principle of freedom of choice of the people in any city or county in which the manufacture or sale of alcoholic beverages has not been prohibited to determine by a local referendum whether the sale of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption shall be authorized in the manner herein provided.

(c)

The General Assembly authorizes and directs all law enforcement officials to enforce strictly the alcoholic beverage laws of this state.

(d)

The General Assembly determines:

(1)

That the tourist and convention industries contribute substantially to the revenues of business enterprises in this state and that income from the tourist trade, conventions, and allied industries is essential to the continued well-being and prosperity of this state;

(2)

That there is extreme competition among states throughout the nation for the tourist and convention business; and

(3)

That all reasonable steps should be taken to retain, foster, and encourage this business and to create favorable competitive conditions therefor in this state.

(e)

In order to encourage tourists and conventions to come to Arkansas, it is essential that visitors to the state be provided accommodations, services, and facilities of a nature to which they are accustomed and competitive with those offered in other states and areas and especially states adjacent to Arkansas.

(f)

It is the intent and purpose of this subchapter to authorize the qualified electors of cities and counties in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is not prohibited by law to approve, by referendum election, the legal sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises of restaurants, hotels, and motels as defined herein.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 132, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-1401.